Utah statutes.
22-3-303.   Apportionment when income interest ends.
(1)  In this section, "undistributed income" means net income received before
the date on which an income interest ends.  The term does not include an item
of income or expense that is due or accrued or net income that has been added
or is required to be added to principal under the terms of the trust.
(2)  When a mandatory income interest ends, the trustee shall pay to a
mandatory income beneficiary who survives that date, or the estate of a
deceased mandatory income beneficiary whose death causes the interest to end,
the beneficiary's share of the undistributed income that is not disposed of
under the terms of the trust unless the beneficiary has an unqualified power
to revoke more than 5% of the trust immediately before the income interest
ends.  In the latter case, the undistributed income from the portion of the
trust that may be revoked must be added to principal.
(3)  When a trustee's obligation to pay a fixed annuity or a fixed fraction of
the value of the trust's assets ends, the trustee shall prorate the final
payment if and to the extent required by applicable law to accomplish a
purpose of the trust or its settlor relating to income, gift, estate, or other
tax requirements.
